Arkansas, session 2025, SB18.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-4-419(f), concerning reports of improper
or illegal practices, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1) By June 30 of each year,:
(A) the Attorney General and each Each prosecuting
attorney to whom the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or the Legislative
Auditor has reported a matter under this section shall file with the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee a disposition report on the status of
the matters that have not been previously reported as resolved to the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; and
(B) The Attorney General shall file with the Legislative
Joint Auditing Committee a disposition report on the status of the following
matters that have not been previously reported as resolved to the Legislative
Joint Auditing Committee:
(i) Findings reported to the Attorney General under
subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section; and
(ii) Transactions reported under subsection (b) of
*MBM031*
01-30-2025 11:26:01 MBM031

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 SB18
this section if the Attorney General has reached an agreement with a
prosecuting attorney to be appointed as a special prosecutor or special
deputy prosecutor regarding the transactions.
(2) A disposition report shall address all matters that have not
been previously reported as resolved under subdivision (f)(1) of this section
prior to and during the preceding calendar year.
(3) A disposition report shall include without limitation:
(A) The date the matter was reported to the Attorney
General or the prosecuting attorney;
(B) The amount of loss or funds unaccounted for in
connection with the matter;
(C) The status or disposition of the matter; and
(D) Other comments pertinent to the investigation or
disposition of the matter.

/s/D. Wallace




















01-30-2025 11:26:01 MBM031